Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.001

Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the criminal profiteering act.

[ 2001 c 222 s 2. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2001 c 222: "The purpose of this act is to respond to State v. Thomas, 103 Wn. App. 800, by reenacting, without substantive changes, the Washington laws relating to criminal profiteering, and the sentencing level ranking for criminal profiteering crimes as they existed prior to December 21, 2000." [ 2001 c 222 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 222: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 9, 2001]." [ 2001 c 222 s 25.]